District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

1-323.01

Annual report to Congress.

Repealed.

June 11, 1878, 20 Stat. 108, ch. 180, § 12
Aug. 2, 1983, D.C. Law 5-24,§ 20, 30 DCR 3341

History

1981 Ed., § 1-332.
1973 Ed., § 1-238.

Prior Codifications

Organic Act of 1878: Section 12 of the Act of June 11, 1878, 20 Stat. 108, ch. 180, read, in its entirety, as follows: “It shall be the duty of the said Commissioners to report to Congress at the next session succeeding their appointment a draft of such additional laws or amendments to existing laws as in their opinion are necessary for the harmonious working of the system hereby adopted, and for the effectual and proper government of the District of Columbia: and said Commissioners shall annually report their official doings in detail to Congress on or before the first Monday of December.”

Editor's Notes